Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-334
Nonresident manufacturer; designated agent for service of process.

Each manufacturer selling pickle cards and pickle card units in this state that is not a resident or corporation shall designate a natural person who is a resident of and living in this state and is nineteen years of age or older as a resident agent for the purpose of receipt and acceptance of service of process and other communications on behalf of the manufacturer. The name, business address where service of process and delivery of mail can be made, and home address of such agent shall be filed with the department.

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 21;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-143.06;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 100;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 81.